Utah statutes.
31A-32a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Account administrator" means any of the following:
(a)  a depository institution as defined in Section 7-1-103;
(b)  a trust company as defined in Section 7-1-103;
(c)  an insurance company authorized to do business in this state under this
title;
(d)  a third party administrator licensed under Section 31A-25-203; and
(e)  an employer if the employer has a self-insured health plan under ERISA.
(2)  "Account holder" means the resident individual who establishes a medical
care savings account or for whose benefit a medical care savings account is
established.
(3)  "Deductible" means the total deductible for an employee and all the
dependents of that employee for a calendar year.
(4)  "Dependent" means the same as "dependent" under Section 31A-30-103.
(5)  "Eligible medical expense" means an expense paid by the taxpayer for:
(a)  medical care described in Section 213(d), Internal Revenue Code;
(b)  the purchase of a health coverage policy, certificate, or contract,
including a qualified higher deductible health plan; or
(c)  premiums on long-term care insurance policies as defined in Section
31A-1-301.
(6)  "Employee" means the individual for whose benefit or for the benefit of
whose dependents a medical care savings account is established.  Employee
includes a self-employed individual.
(7)  "ERISA" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Public
Law 93-406, 88 Stat. 829.
(8)  "Higher deductible" means a deductible of not less than $1,000.
(9)  "Medical care savings account" or "account" means a trust account
established at a depository institution in this state pursuant to a medical
care savings account program to pay the eligible medical expenses of:
(a)  an employee or account holder; and
(b)  the dependents of the employee or account holder.
(10)  "Medical care savings account program" or "program" means one of the
following programs:
(a)  a program established by an employer in which the employer:
(i)  purchases a qualified higher deductible health plan for the benefit of an
employee and the employee's dependents; and
(ii) contributes on behalf of an employee into a medical care savings account;
or
(b)  a program established by an account holder in which the account holder:
(i)  purchases a qualified higher deductible health plan for the benefit of
the account holder and the account holder's dependents; and
(ii)  contributes an amount to the medical care savings account.
(11)  "Qualified higher deductible health plan" means a health coverage
policy, certificate, or contract that:
(a)  provides for payments for covered benefits that exceed the higher
deductible; and
(b)  is purchased by:
(i)  an employer for the benefit of an employee for whom the employer makes
deposits into a medical care savings account; or
(ii)  an account holder.
